Washington statutes.
RCW 37.12.140

Quileute, Chehalis, Swinomish, and Colville Indian reservations—Retrocession of criminal jurisdiction—Short title.

RCW 37.12.100 through 37.12.140 may be known and cited as the Indian reservation criminal jurisdiction retrocession act.

[ 1988 c 108 s 4; 1986 c 267 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 267: See note following RCW 37.12.100.